Washington statutes.
RCW 10.89.040

"State" includes District of Columbia.

For the purpose of this chapter the word "state" shall include the District of Columbia.

[ 1943 c 261 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2252-4. Formerly RCW 10.88.110.]